New.aff
PFX Q Y 576
PFX Q 0 naan [^lmn]
PFX Q l naand l.[^mn]
PFX Q l naann l.[mn]
PFX Q w naamp [w]
PFX Q 0 naamu .
PFX Q 0 naaba .
PFX Q 0 naagu .
PFX Q 0 naagi .
PFX Q 0 naazi .
PFX Q 0 naaki .
PFX Q 0 naabi .
PFX Q 0 naali .
PFX Q 0 naaga .
PFX Q 0 naaka .
PFX Q 0 naabu .
PFX Q 0 naalu .
PFX Q 0 naaku .
PFX Q 0 naatu .
PFX Q 0 munaan [^lmn]
PFX Q l munaand l.[^mn]
PFX Q l munaann l.[mn]
PFX Q w munaamp [w]
PFX Q 0 munaamu .
PFX Q 0 munaaba .
PFX Q 0 munaagu .
PFX Q 0 munaagi .
PFX Q 0 munaazi .
PFX Q 0 munaaki .
PFX Q 0 munaabi .
PFX Q 0 munaali .
PFX Q 0 munaaga .
PFX Q 0 munaaka .
PFX Q 0 munaabu .
PFX Q 0 munaalu .
PFX Q 0 munaaku .
PFX Q 0 munaatu .
PFX Q 0 onoon [^lmn]
PFX Q l onoond l.[^mn]
PFX Q l onoonn l.[mn]
PFX Q w onoomp [w]
PFX Q 0 onoomu .
PFX Q 0 onooba .
PFX Q 0 onoogu .
PFX Q 0 onoogi .
PFX Q 0 onoozi .
PFX Q 0 onooki .
PFX Q 0 onoobi .
PFX Q 0 onooli .
PFX Q 0 onooga .
PFX Q 0 onooka .
PFX Q 0 onoobu .
PFX Q 0 onoolu .
PFX Q 0 onooku .
PFX Q 0 onootu .
PFX Q 0 onaan [^lmn]
PFX Q l onaand l.[^mn]
PFX Q l onaann l.[mn]
PFX Q w onaamp [w]
PFX Q 0 onaamu .
PFX Q 0 onaaba .
PFX Q 0 onaagu .
PFX Q 0 onaagi .
PFX Q 0 onaazi .
PFX Q 0 onaaki .
PFX Q 0 onaabi .
PFX Q 0 onaali .
PFX Q 0 onaaga .
PFX Q 0 onaaka .
PFX Q 0 onaabu .
PFX Q 0 onaalu .
PFX Q 0 onaaku .
PFX Q 0 onaatu .
PFX Q 0 anaan [^lmn]
PFX Q l anaand l.[^mn]
PFX Q l anaann l.[mn]
PFX Q w anaamp [w]
PFX Q 0 anaamu .
PFX Q 0 anaaba .
PFX Q 0 anaagu .
PFX Q 0 anaagi .
PFX Q 0 anaazi .
PFX Q 0 anaaki .
PFX Q 0 anaabi .
PFX Q 0 anaali .
PFX Q 0 anaaga .
PFX Q 0 anaaka .
PFX Q 0 anaabu .
PFX Q 0 anaalu .
PFX Q 0 anaaku .
PFX Q 0 anaatu .
PFX Q 0 tunaan [^lmn]
PFX Q l tunaand l.[^mn]
PFX Q l tunaann l.[mn]
PFX Q w tunaamp [w]
PFX Q 0 tunaamu .
PFX Q 0 tunaaba .
PFX Q 0 tunaagu .
PFX Q 0 tunaagi .
PFX Q 0 tunaazi .
PFX Q 0 tunaaki .
PFX Q 0 tunaabi .
PFX Q 0 tunaali .
PFX Q 0 tunaaga .
PFX Q 0 tunaaka .
PFX Q 0 tunaabu .
PFX Q 0 tunaalu .
PFX Q 0 tunaaku .
PFX Q 0 tunaatu .
PFX Q 0 banaan [^lmn]
PFX Q l banaand l.[^mn]
PFX Q l banaann l.[mn]
PFX Q w banaamp [w]
PFX Q 0 banaamu .
PFX Q 0 banaaba .
PFX Q 0 banaagu .
PFX Q 0 banaagi .
PFX Q 0 banaazi .
PFX Q 0 banaaki .
PFX Q 0 banaabi .
PFX Q 0 banaali .
PFX Q 0 banaaga .
PFX Q 0 banaaka .
PFX Q 0 banaabu .
PFX Q 0 banaalu .
PFX Q 0 banaaku .
PFX Q 0 banaatu .
PFX Q 0 abanaan [^lmn]
PFX Q l abanaand l.[^mn]
PFX Q l abanaann l.[mn]
PFX Q w abanaamp [w]
PFX Q 0 abanaamu .
PFX Q 0 abanaaba .
PFX Q 0 abanaagu .
PFX Q 0 abanaagi .
PFX Q 0 abanaazi .
PFX Q 0 abanaaki .
PFX Q 0 abanaabi .
PFX Q 0 abanaali .
PFX Q 0 abanaaga .
PFX Q 0 abanaaka .
PFX Q 0 abanaabu .
PFX Q 0 abanaalu .
PFX Q 0 abanaaku .
PFX Q 0 abanaatu .
PFX Q 0 gunaan [^lmn]
PFX Q l gunaand l.[^mn]
PFX Q l gunaann l.[mn]
PFX Q w gunaamp [w]
PFX Q 0 gunaamu .
PFX Q 0 gunaaba .
PFX Q 0 gunaagu .
PFX Q 0 gunaagi .
PFX Q 0 gunaazi .
PFX Q 0 gunaaki .
PFX Q 0 gunaabi .
PFX Q 0 gunaali .
PFX Q 0 gunaaga .
PFX Q 0 gunaaka .
PFX Q 0 gunaabu .
PFX Q 0 gunaalu .
PFX Q 0 gunaaku .
PFX Q 0 gunaatu .
PFX Q 0 ogunaan [^lmn]
PFX Q l ogunaand l.[^mn]
PFX Q l ogunaann l.[mn]
PFX Q w ogunaamp [w]
PFX Q 0 ogunaamu .
PFX Q 0 ogunaaba .
PFX Q 0 ogunaagu .
PFX Q 0 ogunaagi .
PFX Q 0 ogunaazi .
PFX Q 0 ogunaaki .
PFX Q 0 ogunaabi .
PFX Q 0 ogunaali .
PFX Q 0 ogunaaga .
PFX Q 0 ogunaaka .
PFX Q 0 ogunaabu .
PFX Q 0 ogunaalu .
PFX Q 0 ogunaaku .
PFX Q 0 ogunaatu .
PFX Q 0 ginaan [^lmn]
PFX Q l ginaand l.[^mn]
PFX Q l ginaann l.[mn]
PFX Q w ginaamp [w]
PFX Q 0 ginaamu .
PFX Q 0 ginaaba .
PFX Q 0 ginaagu .
PFX Q 0 ginaagi .
PFX Q 0 ginaazi .
PFX Q 0 ginaaki .
PFX Q 0 ginaabi .
PFX Q 0 ginaali .
PFX Q 0 ginaaga .
PFX Q 0 ginaaka .
PFX Q 0 ginaabu .
PFX Q 0 ginaalu .
PFX Q 0 ginaaku .
PFX Q 0 ginaatu .
PFX Q 0 eginaan [^lmn]
PFX Q l eginaand l.[^mn]
PFX Q l eginaann l.[mn]
PFX Q w eginaamp [w]
PFX Q 0 eginaamu .
PFX Q 0 eginaaba .
PFX Q 0 eginaagu .
PFX Q 0 eginaagi .
PFX Q 0 eginaazi .
PFX Q 0 eginaaki .
PFX Q 0 eginaabi .
PFX Q 0 eginaali .
PFX Q 0 eginaaga .
PFX Q 0 eginaaka .
PFX Q 0 eginaabu .
PFX Q 0 eginaalu .
PFX Q 0 eginaaku .
PFX Q 0 eginaatu .
PFX Q 0 enaan [^lmn]
PFX Q l enaand l.[^mn]
PFX Q l enaann l.[mn]
PFX Q w enaamp [w]
PFX Q 0 enaamu .
PFX Q 0 enaaba .
PFX Q 0 enaagu .
PFX Q 0 enaagi .
PFX Q 0 enaazi .
PFX Q 0 enaaki .
PFX Q 0 enaabi .
PFX Q 0 enaali .
PFX Q 0 enaaga .
PFX Q 0 enaaka .
PFX Q 0 enaabu .
PFX Q 0 enaalu .
PFX Q 0 enaaku .
PFX Q 0 enaatu .
PFX Q 0 zinaan [^lmn]
PFX Q l zinaand l.[^mn]
PFX Q l zinaann l.[mn]
PFX Q w zinaamp [w]
PFX Q 0 zinaamu .
PFX Q 0 zinaaba .
PFX Q 0 zinaagu .
PFX Q 0 zinaagi .
PFX Q 0 zinaazi .
PFX Q 0 zinaaki .
PFX Q 0 zinaabi .
PFX Q 0 zinaali .
PFX Q 0 zinaaga .
PFX Q 0 zinaaka .
PFX Q 0 zinaabu .
PFX Q 0 zinaalu .
PFX Q 0 zinaaku .
PFX Q 0 zinaatu .
PFX Q 0 ezinaan [^lmn]
PFX Q l ezinaand l.[^mn]
PFX Q l ezinaann l.[mn]
PFX Q w ezinaamp [w]
PFX Q 0 ezinaamu .
PFX Q 0 ezinaaba .
PFX Q 0 ezinaagu .
PFX Q 0 ezinaagi .
PFX Q 0 ezinaazi .
PFX Q 0 ezinaaki .
PFX Q 0 ezinaabi .
PFX Q 0 ezinaali .
PFX Q 0 ezinaaga .
PFX Q 0 ezinaaka .
PFX Q 0 ezinaabu .
PFX Q 0 ezinaalu .
PFX Q 0 ezinaaku .
PFX Q 0 ezinaatu .
PFX Q 0 kinaan [^lmn]
PFX Q l kinaand l.[^mn]
PFX Q l kinaann l.[mn]
PFX Q w kinaamp [w]
PFX Q 0 kinaamu .
PFX Q 0 kinaaba .
PFX Q 0 kinaagu .
PFX Q 0 kinaagi .
PFX Q 0 kinaazi .
PFX Q 0 kinaaki .
PFX Q 0 kinaabi .
PFX Q 0 kinaali .
PFX Q 0 kinaaga .
PFX Q 0 kinaaka .
PFX Q 0 kinaabu .
PFX Q 0 kinaalu .
PFX Q 0 kinaaku .
PFX Q 0 kinaatu .
PFX Q 0 ekinaan [^lmn]
PFX Q l ekinaand l.[^mn]
PFX Q l ekinaann l.[mn]
PFX Q w ekinaamp [w]
PFX Q 0 ekinaamu .
PFX Q 0 ekinaaba .
PFX Q 0 ekinaagu .
PFX Q 0 ekinaagi .
PFX Q 0 ekinaazi .
PFX Q 0 ekinaaki .
PFX Q 0 ekinaabi .
PFX Q 0 ekinaali .
PFX Q 0 ekinaaga .
PFX Q 0 ekinaaka .
PFX Q 0 ekinaabu .
PFX Q 0 ekinaalu .
PFX Q 0 ekinaaku .
PFX Q 0 ekinaatu .
PFX Q 0 binaan [^lmn]
PFX Q l binaand l.[^mn]
PFX Q l binaann l.[mn]
PFX Q w binaamp [w]
PFX Q 0 binaamu .
PFX Q 0 binaaba .
PFX Q 0 binaagu .
PFX Q 0 binaagi .
PFX Q 0 binaazi .
PFX Q 0 binaaki .
PFX Q 0 binaabi .
PFX Q 0 binaali .
PFX Q 0 binaaga .
PFX Q 0 binaaka .
PFX Q 0 binaabu .
PFX Q 0 binaalu .
PFX Q 0 binaaku .
PFX Q 0 binaatu .
PFX Q 0 ebinaan [^lmn]
PFX Q l ebinaand l.[^mn]
PFX Q l ebinaann l.[mn]
PFX Q w ebinaamp [w]
PFX Q 0 ebinaamu .
PFX Q 0 ebinaaba .
PFX Q 0 ebinaagu .
PFX Q 0 ebinaagi .
PFX Q 0 ebinaazi .
PFX Q 0 ebinaaki .
PFX Q 0 ebinaabi .
PFX Q 0 ebinaali .
PFX Q 0 ebinaaga .
PFX Q 0 ebinaaka .
PFX Q 0 ebinaabu .
PFX Q 0 ebinaalu .
PFX Q 0 ebinaaku .
PFX Q 0 ebinaatu .
PFX Q 0 linaan [^lmn]
PFX Q l linaand l.[^mn]
PFX Q l linaann l.[mn]
PFX Q w linaamp [w]
PFX Q 0 linaamu .
PFX Q 0 linaaba .
PFX Q 0 linaagu .
PFX Q 0 linaagi .
PFX Q 0 linaazi .
PFX Q 0 linaaki .
PFX Q 0 linaabi .
PFX Q 0 linaali .
PFX Q 0 linaaga .
PFX Q 0 linaaka .
PFX Q 0 linaabu .
PFX Q 0 linaalu .
PFX Q 0 linaaku .
PFX Q 0 linaatu .
PFX Q 0 elinaan [^lmn]
PFX Q l elinaand l.[^mn]
PFX Q l elinaann l.[mn]
PFX Q w elinaamp [w]
PFX Q 0 elinaamu .
PFX Q 0 elinaaba .
PFX Q 0 elinaagu .
PFX Q 0 elinaagi .
PFX Q 0 elinaazi .
PFX Q 0 elinaaki .
PFX Q 0 elinaabi .
PFX Q 0 elinaali .
PFX Q 0 elinaaga .
PFX Q 0 elinaaka .
PFX Q 0 elinaabu .
PFX Q 0 elinaalu .
PFX Q 0 elinaaku .
PFX Q 0 elinaatu .
PFX Q 0 ganaan [^lmn]
PFX Q l ganaand l.[^mn]
PFX Q l ganaann l.[mn]
PFX Q w ganaamp [w]
PFX Q 0 ganaamu .
PFX Q 0 ganaaba .
PFX Q 0 ganaagu .
PFX Q 0 ganaagi .
PFX Q 0 ganaazi .
PFX Q 0 ganaaki .
PFX Q 0 ganaabi .
PFX Q 0 ganaali .
PFX Q 0 ganaaga .
PFX Q 0 ganaaka .
PFX Q 0 ganaabu .
PFX Q 0 ganaalu .
PFX Q 0 ganaaku .
PFX Q 0 ganaatu .
PFX Q 0 aganaan [^lmn]
PFX Q l aganaand l.[^mn]
PFX Q l aganaann l.[mn]
PFX Q w aganaamp [w]
PFX Q 0 aganaamu .
PFX Q 0 aganaaba .
PFX Q 0 aganaagu .
PFX Q 0 aganaagi .
PFX Q 0 aganaazi .
PFX Q 0 aganaaki .
PFX Q 0 aganaabi .
PFX Q 0 aganaali .
PFX Q 0 aganaaga .
PFX Q 0 aganaaka .
PFX Q 0 aganaabu .
PFX Q 0 aganaalu .
PFX Q 0 aganaaku .
PFX Q 0 aganaatu .
PFX Q 0 kanaan [^lmn]
PFX Q l kanaand l.[^mn]
PFX Q l kanaann l.[mn]
PFX Q w kanaamp [w]
PFX Q 0 kanaamu .
